weTitle

AI-Enabled Autonomous Inspection and Predictive Maintenance for Moroccan Aerospace MRO:
A Tripartite Innovation Framework for Value-Chain Upgrading (2026–2030)

Abstract

Chapter 1: Introduction

1.1 Background and Rationale
1.2 Problem Statement
1.3 Research Questions and Objectives
1.4 Significance and Expected Contributions
1.5 Scope, Limitations, and Contingency
1.6 Definition of Key Terms
1.7 Thesis Structure

Chapter 2: Literature Review

2.1 Introduction
2.2 The Moroccan Aerospace Ecosystem: Industrial Maturity with Structural Gaps
2.3 National AI and Digital Transformation Strategies
2.4 Global Cluster Models for Aerospace Innovation
2.5 AI‑Driven Autonomous Systems for Aerospace MRO
2.6 Innovation Policy Instruments for University‑Industry Collaboration
2.7 Research Gap and Contribution

Chapter 3: Methodology

3.1 Introduction
3.2 Research Philosophy and Design
3.3 Case Study Selection
3.4 Data Collection (Theoretical/Secondary)
3.5 AI Model Development: Hybrid CNN‑LSTM Architecture (Conceptual)
3.6 Validation Metrics (Theoretical)
3.7 Return on Investment Calculation (Literature‑Based)
3.8 AI Innovation Voucher Feasibility Study (Methodological Design)
3.9 Skills Passport Pilot (Methodological Design)
3.10 Contingency Plan for Drone Regulation
3.11 Ethical Considerations and Risk Mitigation
3.12 Summary of Methodological Framework

Chapter 4: Strategic Framework and Baseline Analysis

4.1 Introduction
4.2 The Moroccan Aerospace MRO Context: A Theoretical Baseline
4.3 Regulatory Baseline: Civilian Drone Framework in Morocco
4.4 Stakeholder‑Informed Strategic Framework (Theoretical Co‑Design)
4.5 Theoretical Baseline Summary

Chapter 5: Proposed Technical Architecture and Conceptual Design

5.1 Introduction
5.2 Proposed Autonomous Inspection Modalities
5.3 Proposed AI Pipeline Architecture
5.4 Theoretical ROI Model (Literature‑Based)
5.5 Comparison with International Systems
5.6 Summary of Proposed Technical Contributions

Chapter 6: Discussion and Policy Implications

6.1 Introduction
6.2 Interpretation of Theoretical Findings
6.3 Barriers and Enablers for AI Adoption in Moroccan Aerospace MRO
6.4 Policy Implications
6.5 Transferability to Other Sectors
6.6 Limitations of the Theoretical Research
6.7 Summary

Chapter 7: Conclusion and Future Research

7.1 Introduction
7.2 Summary of the Research
7.3 Contributions of the Research
7.4 Future Research Agenda
7.5 Concluding Remarks

Abstract

The Moroccan aerospace sector has successfully established itself as Africa’s leading manufacturing and assembly hub, with approximately 150 companies generating €2.5 billion in annual revenue and employing 23,000–26,000 workers. However, the local integration rate of 40–42% remains focused on production rather than original design or autonomous systems, and only 1.7% of Morocco’s 23,000 annual engineering graduates enter the aeronautics sector. Simultaneously, the national “Maroc IA 2030” strategy (launched January 2026) targets a $10 billion GDP contribution and 240,000 digital jobs by 2030, supported by sovereign infrastructure including the UM6P Toubkal supercomputer and the upcoming Dakhla AI Battery.

This PhD research addresses the structural gap between industrial maturity and high-value innovation by focusing on AI-driven autonomous systems for aerospace Manufacturing, Repair, and Overhaul (MRO). Through a comparative analysis of global clusters (Toulouse, Montreal, Singapore), an assessment of Morocco’s emerging but uncertain regulatory framework for civil drones, and a calibrated ROI model, the study proposes a narrowed, PhD-executable framework centered on three actionable pillars: (1) a tripartite Integrated Research Unit (IRU) joint lab modeled on Singapore’s A*STAR, with the PhD candidate as the seed researcher; (2) a feasibility study for a sector-specific AI Innovation Voucher scheme; and (3) a pilot Skills Passport for AI-augmented inspection technicians. Unlike prior descriptive studies, this research delivers a functional prototype—either a drone-based or ground-based autonomous non-destructive inspection system—with a contingency for regulatory delays, validated at a single partner facility within the Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur).

The expected outcomes include a working prototype achieving >95% defect detection accuracy and a 60–80% reduction in inspection time, a quantified ROI of 2–3x over three years (calibrated to Moroccan labor costs), one patent application, and a policy brief for a regulatory sandbox. This research positions Morocco not as a mere subcontractor but as a critical node in the global aerospace Industry 4.0 landscape, while maintaining realistic scope for a 36-month PhD.

Keywords: AI-driven autonomous systems, aerospace MRO, Moroccan industrial strategy, drone-based inspection, predictive maintenance, CNN-LSTM, innovation voucher, triple helix model, regulatory sandbox.


Chapter 1: Introduction

1.1 Background

The global aerospace industry is undergoing a profound technological shift toward Industry 4.0. Original Equipment Manufacturers (OEMs) such as Airbus, Boeing, and Safran increasingly demand not only cost‑effective manufacturing but also intelligent, data‑driven solutions for predictive maintenance, autonomous quality control, and supply chain optimization. In this context, autonomous systems powered by artificial intelligence (AI)—including drones for visual inspection, computer vision for non‑destructive evaluation (NDE), and predictive maintenance algorithms—have become strategic differentiators.

Morocco has successfully capitalized on the first wave of this transformation by establishing itself as Africa’s leading aerospace manufacturing and assembly hub. As of 2026, the sector comprises approximately 150 companies, predominantly concentrated in the Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur), generating €2.5 billion in annual revenue and employing 23,000–26,000 workers. The local integration rate has improved from 18% in 2010 to 40–42% today. Recent high‑profile investments—such as Safran’s €280 million landing‑gear facility announced in February 2026 (operations from 2029)—confirm the country’s industrial attractiveness and the confidence of global OEMs.

However, a critical observation emerges from the data. Despite world‑class vocational training (e.g., the Institut des Métiers de l’Aéronautique, training 1,200 technicians annually with a 95% employment rate) and engineering schools (AEROSUP, UIR, UM6P), only 1.7% of Morocco’s 23,000 annual engineering graduates enter the aeronautics sector. This talent bottleneck is exacerbated by low R&D intensity: the vast majority of GIMAS member firms focus on production, with minimal patent generation or original system design. The sector remains largely a manufacturing and assembly ecosystem rather than an innovation ecosystem.

Concurrently, the Moroccan government has launched ambitious digital strategies. “Maroc IA 2030” (January 2026) explicitly prioritises industrial AI, targeting a $10 billion GDP contribution and 240,000 digital jobs by 2030. The first Al Jazari Institute for Industry X.0 was inaugurated in Fès (March 2026) to support predictive maintenance, robotics, and data analytics. Sovereign digital infrastructure—including the UM6P “Toubkal” supercomputer (Africa’s most powerful) and the planned 500 MW “Dakhla AI Battery” data centre (100% renewable energy)—provides low‑cost, sovereign compute for training and deploying AI models without foreign currency leakage.

These concurrent developments create a unique but time‑sensitive window for research that bridges the gap between industrial maturity and high‑value innovation. This PhD thesis responds to that window by focusing on AI‑driven autonomous systems for aerospace Manufacturing, Repair, and Overhaul (MRO)—a domain where even modest efficiency gains yield multi‑million euro savings.

1.2 Problem Statement

The Moroccan aerospace sector has reached a strategic inflection point. It possesses a robust industrial base, a skilled workforce, and political commitment to digital transformation. Yet it remains trapped in a low‑R&D equilibrium: most firms are subcontractors executing predefined manufacturing or MRO tasks, rather than co‑innovators generating proprietary technologies or autonomous systems.

Three structural gaps sustain this equilibrium:

1. Innovation infrastructure gap: Unlike successful clusters such as Singapore’s A*STAR (Agency for Science, Technology and Research) or Montreal’s triple‑helix model, Morocco lacks a dedicated, membership‑based joint research laboratory that co‑locates PhD researchers with industry engineers to solve real‑time manufacturing challenges.
2. Talent mismatch gap: Only 1.7% of Morocco’s engineering graduates enter aerospace, and fewer still have skills in AI, robotics, or data science applied to aviation. Existing training programmes are predominantly vocational (e.g., IMA) or generalist engineering, with no specialised tracks in AI‑augmented MRO or autonomous inspection.
3. Regulatory and financing gap: Civilian drone operations remain heavily restricted in Morocco as of mid‑2026, blocking one of the most promising autonomous inspection technologies. Simultaneously, small and medium‑sized enterprises (SMEs) lack accessible, low‑risk financing mechanisms to “buy” AI R&D from universities—leading to underinvestment in innovation.

Prior research on Moroccan aerospace has been largely descriptive, focusing on cluster evolution or macroeconomic impact. No peer‑reviewed study has proposed a quantified, PhD‑executable roadmap that integrates AI‑driven autonomous systems with specific industrial ROI targets, regulatory pathways, and human capital instruments—while acknowledging and mitigating real‑world constraints such as drone regulation uncertainty and data scarcity.

Therefore, the central problem this thesis addresses is: How can a single PhD research project design, develop, and validate an AI‑driven autonomous inspection system for aerospace MRO within a real industrial setting in Morocco, while simultaneously proposing a scalable tripartite innovation framework that addresses the structural gaps above?

1.3 Research Questions and Objectives

1.3.1 Primary Research Question

How can AI‑driven autonomous systems (specifically, vision‑based inspection and predictive maintenance) be co‑developed and deployed within a Moroccan aerospace MRO or manufacturing facility to achieve measurable reductions in inspection time and defect detection accuracy, while generating a positive return on investment within 24 months of pilot deployment?

1.3.2 Specific Research Questions (RQs)

· RQ1 (Technical feasibility): To what extent can a hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture, trained on a combination of public datasets and synthetic data, achieve >95% defect detection accuracy for corrosion, fatigue cracks, or lightning strikes on aircraft fuselage or composite landing gear components under Moroccan MRO conditions (lighting, dust, limited labelled data)?
· RQ2 (Operational ROI): What is the minimum viable scale—in terms of partner commitment (number of aircraft or components inspected per month), data volume (labelled images or sensor readings), and compute resources—required to achieve a 60–80% reduction in inspection time and a 2–3x return on investment within 24 months of pilot deployment at a single Midparc facility?
· RQ3 (Institutional transfer): What institutional conditions (co‑location hours, IP ownership, shared funding, joint supervision) predict successful technology transfer from PhD research to industrial adoption, as evidenced by a signed joint lab agreement and at least one co‑authored patent application?

1.3.3 Primary Objectives

1. Design and develop a functional autonomous inspection prototype (either drone‑based for exterior fuselage inspection or ground‑based robotic arm for component inspection, with a regulatory contingency plan).
2. Validate the prototype in a live industrial setting at a partner facility within the Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur), measuring defect detection accuracy, inspection time reduction, and ROI.
3. Propose and initiate a tripartite Integrated Research Unit (IRU) joint lab, with the PhD candidate as the seed researcher, including a memorandum of understanding with at least one GIMAS member firm.
4. Deliver a feasibility study for an AI Innovation Voucher scheme tailored to Moroccan aerospace SMEs, based on primary data from 3–5 firms.
5. Pilot a Skills Passport micro‑credential programme for AI‑augmented inspection technicians, training 20–30 participants from IMA or AEROSUP.
6. File one provisional patent application covering the novel aspects of the AI‑driven inspection system.

1.4 Significance and Expected Contributions

1.4.1 Academic Contributions

· Novel technical architecture: A hybrid CNN‑LSTM model adapted to Moroccan industrial constraints (limited labelled data, variable lighting, cost‑sensitive edge deployment), with performance metrics benchmarked against commercial solutions.
· Empirical ROI model: A data‑driven return on investment framework calibrated to Moroccan labour costs and facility scales, filling a gap in the literature on AI adoption in African aerospace.
· Institutional design principles: A set of validated conditions for tripartite joint labs in lower‑middle‑income countries, extending the triple‑helix literature beyond European and North American contexts.

1.4.2 Industrial and Economic Contributions

· Direct operational savings: A validated pilot system capable of reducing inspection time by 60–80% and defect detection errors by a projected 30–50%, translating to estimated annual savings of €150,000–250,000 per facility (calibrated to Moroccan costs).
· Patent and IP: At least one provisional patent, creating tangible intellectual property assets for the partner firm and the university.
· Talent pipeline: A pilot Skills Passport cohort of 20–30 technicians certified in AI‑augmented inspection, with a target 20% salary premium and direct placement in GIMAS member firms.

1.4.3 Policy and Ecosystem Contributions

· Regulatory sandbox proposal: A concrete, co‑designed proposal for indoor/hangar testing of autonomous inspection systems at Midparc, submitted to the DGAC and the Ministry of Digital Transition.
· Innovation voucher feasibility study: A ready‑to‑implement blueprint for a €20,000–50,000 AI Innovation Voucher scheme, including eligibility criteria, evaluation metrics, and funding sources (e.g., Startup Venture Building programme, AfDB).
· Replicable framework: The IRU joint lab model, if successful, can be transferred to other Moroccan industrial sectors (automotive, phosphate, renewables).

1.5 Scope, Limitations, and Contingency

1.5.1 Scope

This thesis focuses on the Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur) as the primary empirical setting, given its concentration of GIMAS members, proximity to UM6P and AI Movement, and access to existing MRO facilities. The research covers:

· Applications: Visual inspection for corrosion, cracks, and lightning strikes (exterior fuselage or composite landing gear components) and predictive maintenance using vibration/temperature data (secondary, time‑permitting).
· Technologies: Autonomous drones (primary) or ground‑based robotic arms (contingency), computer vision (CNNs), and edge AI deployment.
· Partners: At least one GIMAS member firm (preferably a Safran supplier or composite specialist), the Al Jazari Institute, and UM6P’s Toubkal supercomputing centre.

The thesis does not cover military aviation, space systems, air traffic management, or AI for supply chain logistics beyond MRO.

1.5.2 Limitations

1. Drone regulation uncertainty: As of mid‑2026, civilian drone operations for commercial MRO remain prohibited without special authorisation. No public evidence confirms imminent liberalisation. This is a critical risk (see contingency below).
2. Data scarcity: Aviation defect datasets (especially for rare failure modes like lightning strikes) are proprietary. The research will rely on transfer learning from public datasets and synthetic data generation, which may limit generalisability.
3. Single facility pilot: The validation is limited to one partner facility. Findings may not be statistically representative of the entire Moroccan aerospace sector.
4. Time horizon: A 36‑month PhD cannot capture long‑term maintenance cycles (e.g., 5‑10 year corrosion evolution). ROI projections beyond 24 months are extrapolated.

1.5.3 Contingency Plan for Drone Regulation

If the DGAC has not granted authorisation for outdoor or hangar drone flights by Month 9 (end of Phase 1), the primary prototype will pivot to a ground‑based autonomous system:

· Option A: A robotic arm equipped with a high‑resolution camera and thermal sensor, mounted on a mobile base, for inspecting landing gear components or composite panels inside a controlled laboratory or factory cell.
· Option B: A fixed multi‑camera array with conveyor or turntable for automated inspection of smaller parts (e.g., brackets, fasteners).

Both options remain directly relevant to the new Safran landing‑gear plant (operational from 2029) and require no regulatory changes. The AI model (CNN‑LSTM) and the overall research design remain identical; only the physical platform changes. This contingency is explicitly budgeted in Phase 2 equipment costs.

1.6 Definition of Key Terms

Term Definition
AI‑driven autonomous system A cyber‑physical system that uses artificial intelligence (e.g., computer vision, predictive models) to perform inspection or maintenance tasks without real‑time human control.
MRO Maintenance, Repair, and Overhaul – the set of activities ensuring aircraft airworthiness, including scheduled inspections and unscheduled repairs.
NDE / NDI Non‑destructive evaluation / inspection – inspection methods (ultrasonic, thermographic, visual) that do not damage the component.
CNN‑LSTM Convolutional Neural Network (for spatial feature extraction) combined with Long Short‑Term Memory (for temporal pattern recognition).
GIMAS Groupement des Industries Marocaines Aéronautiques et Spatiales – the main Moroccan aerospace industry association.
IRU Integrated Research Unit – a co‑located university‑industry research team (one PhD, one post‑doc, one industry engineer).
Triple helix model Innovation framework emphasising collaboration between university, industry, and government.
Regulatory sandbox A controlled, time‑limited environment where innovative technologies can be tested under relaxed regulatory requirements with safeguards.


Chapter 2: Literature Review

2.1 Introduction

This chapter provides a systematic review of the literature underpinning the research framework presented in Chapter 1. The review is organised into five thematic sections. First, the Moroccan aerospace ecosystem is examined in terms of its industrial structure, human capital constraints, and strategic positioning within global value chains. Second, Morocco’s national AI and digital transformation strategies are analysed as enabling policy frameworks. Third, three international cluster models—Toulouse, Montreal and Singapore—are compared to extract transferable institutional design principles. Fourth, the technical literature on AI‑driven autonomous systems for aerospace MRO is critically assessed, focusing on drone‑based visual inspection, predictive maintenance, and hybrid CNN‑LSTM architectures for non‑destructive evaluation (NDE). Fifth, innovation policy instruments—joint labs, vouchers and skills passports—are reviewed as mechanisms for bridging the university‑industry divide. The chapter concludes by identifying the specific research gap that this thesis addresses.

2.2 The Moroccan Aerospace Ecosystem: Industrial Maturity with Structural Gaps

2.2.1 Sectoral Overview and Economic Significance

Morocco has transformed its aerospace sector from a nascent subcontracting industry into Africa’s leading manufacturing and assembly hub. As of 2025, the sector comprises approximately 150 companies concentrated in Casablanca (Midparc/Nouaceur), Tangier, Rabat and Fès, generating annual revenue of €2.5 billion (approximately $2.8 billion) and employing 26,000 full‑time workers. Exports reached MAD 26.44 billion ($2.64 billion) in 2024, a 14.9 % year‑on‑year increase, with the assembly segment alone expanding by 23.6 %. The local integration rate has risen from 18 % in 2010 to over 40 % in certain segments today, reflecting growing sophistication among domestic suppliers.

Major international players—Airbus, Boeing, Safran, Spirit AeroSystems, Collins Aerospace and Bombardier—have integrated Morocco as a strategic link in their global value chains. The sector’s competitive advantages include production costs of approximately €25 per hour (compared to €100‑120 in Europe or the United States), political stability, free trade agreements with the European Union and the United States, and proximity to European markets.

2.2.2 Recent Strategic Investments

Three recent investment announcements underscore Morocco’s growing strategic importance. In October 2025, Safran announced an investment exceeding €350 million in two new LEAP engine facilities in Casablanca: a maintenance, repair and overhaul (MRO) site (25,000 m², capacity of 150 engines annually, 600 jobs by 2030) and a LEAP‑1A assembly line (300 jobs, 350 engines annually). In February 2026, Safran further committed to a €280 million landing‑gear manufacturing facility within the Casablanca airport zone (26,000 m², 500 skilled workers, operations from 2029), powered entirely by decarbonised electricity. These investments, concentrated in the Midparc free zone, create an immediate and urgent demand for AI‑augmented quality control and inspection capabilities.

2.2.3 Human Capital Constraints

Despite the sector’s impressive growth, a structural talent bottleneck persists. Morocco produces approximately 23,000 engineering graduates annually, yet only 400 (1.7 %) enter the aeronautics sector. This mismatch is particularly acute given the sector’s transition toward advanced manufacturing, where skills in AI, robotics and data science are increasingly required. The Institut des Métiers de l’Aéronautique (IMA) trains 1,200 technicians annually with a 95 % employment rate, but its curriculum remains predominantly vocational rather than focused on Industry 4.0 competencies. Institutions such as AEROSUP (the first post‑baccalaureate aeronautical engineering school in Morocco) and UM6P’s engineering programmes produce graduates, but specialised AI‑aerospace tracks are absent from their publicly documented curricula. This gap between industrial demand and available talent is a recurring theme in the literature on emerging aerospace clusters (Armellini et al., 2011) and is identified as a primary barrier to value‑chain upgrading in developing economies (Ernst, 2016).

2.2.4 Literature Gap: Descriptive versus Prescriptive Studies

The existing academic literature on Moroccan aerospace is predominantly descriptive. Studies have documented the sector’s evolution, foreign investment patterns and export performance (e.g., El Aoufi & Bensaïd, 2012; Labaronne & Roux, 2017), but no peer‑reviewed research has proposed a quantified, executable roadmap for integrating AI‑driven autonomous systems into MRO or manufacturing operations. Furthermore, the literature has not distinguished between what a single PhD project can deliver versus what the broader ecosystem must implement—a distinction critical for realistic research design. This thesis responds to that gap.

2.3 National AI and Digital Transformation Strategies

2.3.1 Maroc Digital 2030 and the National AI Roadmap

Morocco has established a comprehensive policy framework to support digital transformation. The “Maroc Digital 2030” strategy, launched in 2024, aims to modernise public services and digital infrastructure (Ministry of Digital Transition, 2024). Building on this foundation, the “Maroc IA 2030” (AI Made in Morocco) national AI strategy was launched on 12 January 2026, targeting a $10 billion contribution to GDP and the creation of 240,000 digital jobs by 2030, including 50,000 jobs directly linked to AI.

A centrepiece of the strategy is the establishment of a national network of “Al‑Jazari Institutes”—regional centres of excellence designed to link academic research with industrial deployment. The Al‑Jazari Institute for Industry X.0 was inaugurated in Fès in March 2026, with priority domains including the Internet of Things, advanced robotics, production data analytics, and predictive maintenance. The Dakhla Al‑Jazari Institute will specialise in AI and energy transition, while a central “JAZARI ROOT” institute focuses on digital sovereignty and data science.

The strategy also emphasises technological sovereignty, including the development of sovereign cloud infrastructure and the planned 500 MW “Dakhla AI Battery” green data centre, which will provide renewable‑powered compute capacity for large‑scale AI model training. International partnerships have been established, including a cooperation agreement with Mistral AI to establish a joint R&D laboratory.

2.3.2 Sovereign Compute Infrastructure

The UM6P “Toubkal” supercomputer, Africa’s most powerful, provides the necessary infrastructure for training large‑scale AI models without reliance on international cloud providers. Toubkal supports a diverse range of workloads—from tightly coupled MPI simulations to modern large‑scale AI training—and combines free cooling with a 1 MW solar power plant for energy efficiency. The supercomputer is accessible to Moroccan researchers and has been used for hands‑on training workshops for master’s students and PhD candidates.

2.3.3 Regulatory Framework for Civilian Drones

A critical regulatory development for this research is the draft decree on civilian drones prepared by the Directorate General for Civil Aviation (DGAC). As of October 2025, the draft decree has been submitted to the General Secretariat of the Government for finalisation. The decree establishes a specific regulatory framework for the design, production, maintenance and operation of unmanned aircraft, requiring a certificate issued by the DGAC for all relevant activities. However, as of mid‑2026, civilian drone operations remain heavily restricted in Morocco, with the general rule being that importation, possession and use of drones are prohibited. This regulatory uncertainty is a significant risk for this research, which the methodology (Chapter 3) addresses through a contingency plan.

2.3.4 Literature Gap: Implementation Readiness

While policy documents articulate ambitious goals, the academic literature has not yet examined the implementation readiness of Morocco’s AI strategy for industrial applications. Questions regarding the translation of national AI policy into sector‑specific roadmaps (e.g., for aerospace), the operationalisation of Al‑Jazari Institutes as joint research platforms, and the mechanisms for SME engagement remain unexplored. This research contributes to filling this gap by proposing concrete implementation instruments aligned with national policy.

2.4 Global Cluster Models for Aerospace Innovation

2.4.1 Montreal: The Triple Helix Model

The Montreal aerospace cluster, comprising approximately 206 companies, is widely cited in the literature as a successful example of “triple helix” collaboration—integrating university, industry and government stakeholders to drive disruptive innovation (Armellini et al., 2011; Koschatzky & Kroll, 2007). Montreal is the only location globally where an entire aircraft can be assembled from locally manufactured components, supported by an R&D environment that accounts for more than 70 % of Canadian aerospace R&D spending. The triple helix model emphasises “circulation” of knowledge and personnel among the three spheres, facilitated by dedicated cluster organisations such as Aéro Montréal, which serve as neutral convenors for collaborative projects.

For Morocco, the triple helix model offers a relevant template because it does not depend on the presence of a dominant OEM. Instead, it enables decentralised but coordinated innovation among numerous SMEs and large firms—a structural feature shared by Morocco’s GIMAS network. However, the literature notes that successful triple helix implementation requires sustained government commitment, patient capital, and intermediary organisations capable of managing intellectual property across partners (Etzkowitz & Leydesdorff, 2000).

2.4.2 Singapore: The A*STAR Joint Lab Model

Singapore’s Agency for Science, Technology and Research (A*STAR) provides an alternative model focused on public‑private joint laboratories. The Advanced Remanufacturing and Technology Centre (ARTC) operates a “Model Factory” that serves as a living laboratory where industry partners, SMEs and public researchers co‑develop and test‑bed Industry 4.0 technologies before adoption.

A notable example relevant to this thesis is the S$60 million joint lab established by A*STAR, Rolls‑Royce and Singapore Aero Engine Services (SAESL) to develop next‑generation aerospace MRO capabilities enabled by advanced processes, automation and digital technologies. The lab comprises five thematic areas: smart assembly systems, integrated remanufacturing technologies, advanced fan blade manufacturing, future manufacturing processes, and knowledge‑based manufacturing using Industry 4.0 methods. Critically, the Model Factory initiative includes explicit mechanisms for SME engagement, allowing smaller firms to test new technologies with the help of public sector researchers before committing to adoption.

The Singaporean model is directly transferable to Morocco because it was designed for a small, open economy seeking to move up the value chain from manufacturing to innovation. Unlike the OEM‑centric Toulouse model, it does not require a dominant local anchor firm. However, the literature notes that A*STAR’s success depended on sustained public investment (approximately S$2 billion annually in R&D) and a long‑term policy horizon—conditions that Morocco is only beginning to establish.

2.4.3 Toulouse: The OEM‑Centric Model

The Toulouse cluster, dominated by Airbus, represents a top‑down model where innovation is driven primarily by the OEM’s supplier development programmes and procurement requirements (Grossetti & Bès, 2003). While highly successful, this model is less directly transferable to Morocco because no single Moroccan firm has the procurement power of Airbus. However, Toulouse offers lessons in sustainability and certification—areas where Airbus has invested heavily in AI for quality assurance and predictive maintenance.

2.4.4 Synthesis: Design Principles for Morocco

From these three models, the following design principles for the proposed Integrated Research Unit (IRU) are extracted:

Design Principle Source Model Relevance to Morocco
Co‑location of researchers with industry engineers Singapore (ARTC) Reduces technology transfer friction; enables tacit knowledge exchange
Neutral convenor organisation (e.g., GIMAS, AMC) Montreal (Aéro Montréal) Manages IP and coordinates among diverse partners
Model factory / living laboratory Singapore (ARTC) Allows low‑risk testing of new technologies before adoption
SME engagement mechanisms Both Montreal and Singapore Prevents innovation from being captured solely by large firms
Long‑term funding commitment (5‑10 years) Singapore (A*STAR) Provides stability for PhD‑scale and post‑PhD continuation

2.5 AI‑Driven Autonomous Systems for Aerospace MRO

2.5.1 Drone‑Based Visual Inspection

The application of autonomous drones for aircraft exterior inspection has matured rapidly. Donecle, a French company pioneering this domain, combines automated UAVs with computer vision algorithms to inspect aircraft quickly and reliably, increasing aircraft availability by accelerating inspections and providing data analysis solutions for maintenance optimisation. Industry projections indicate that by the end of 2025, all key players are expected to have obtained regulatory approvals for full‑scale deployment.

Emerging technologies include hyperspectral imaging drones capable of detecting degradation and damage that the human eye cannot see (PAM APAC, 2025), and AI‑based diagnostic systems covering the entire drone lifecycle from manufacturing to operational deployment. Techno‑economic analyses of smart hangar inspection operations have developed actionable methods for balancing accuracy, coverage and budget in autonomous robotic inspection systems within MRO hangars.

The ROI case for drone inspection is well documented in industry literature. For a mid‑sized MRO facility, autonomous drone inspection can achieve 80 % reduction in inspection time and a 3.4x return on investment within 12 months. However, these figures are based on European and North American labour costs. This research will calibrate the ROI model to Moroccan labour rates (€25/hour compared to €100‑120/hour in Europe) to produce realistic projections.

2.5.2 Predictive Maintenance

Predictive maintenance enabled by AI and digital twins has become a strategic priority for global aerospace operators. The literature documents several recent advances. The UK Royal Navy has expanded AI predictive maintenance to its fixed‑wing aircraft fleet using the “Motherlode” analytics platform to predict failures, reduce unnecessary maintenance and improve fleet availability. Odysight.ai has developed an AI‑powered visual analytics platform that converts visual data into actionable maintenance intelligence, enhancing flight safety and reducing unscheduled downtime. The US Marine Corps has selected Virtualitics to apply predictive technology to accelerate maintenance on MV‑22 Osprey squadrons.

At the MRO Middle East 2026 conference, industry experts emphasised that AI will integrate data across the “MRO continuum” for better fault resolution, with AI providing full operational context to proactive parts removal. Academic research has proposed data‑driven frameworks for maintenance prediction under sparse observational data, implementing and comparing two distinct methodologies for aircraft components. A complex adaptive systems perspective has been proposed to bridge the theory‑practice gap in AI‑driven automation of aviation equipment inspection, addressing data limitations, model performance degradation and deployment challenges.

The economic case is compelling: between 2019 and 2025, easyJet avoided 1,343 cancellations and 171 major delays by utilising predictive maintenance AI (easyJet annual reports). Industry estimates suggest that such strategies can cut unscheduled repairs by 30‑40 %. For the Moroccan aerospace cluster, which aims for a 1 % reduction in overall operational costs, this represents approximately €25 million in annual savings.

2.5.3 Hybrid CNN‑LSTM Architectures for NDE

The technical core of this research lies at the intersection of composite materials engineering and AI‑driven NDE. Recent literature has focused on hybrid architectures that capture both spatial and temporal features from multi‑modal sensor data.

A comprehensive review of AI for image‑ and signal‑based NDT in aerospace structures (Donatus, 2025) presents a structured synthesis organised around the two dominant data paradigms: image‑based and signal‑based inspection. The review specifically identifies hybrid CNN‑LSTM architectures and emerging transformer models as the frontier of this field.

In the specific domain of aircraft composite inspection, researchers have proposed an improved Feature Enhancement Network (FEN)‑CNN‑BiLSTM method for impact damage depth prediction in civil aircraft composites using multi‑domain terahertz spectroscopy, addressing the issue of low accuracy and stability in traditional CNN‑based defect depth prediction. Machine learning‑enhanced ultrasonic phased array inspection for aerospace CFRP composites has been evaluated using a hybrid method combining time‑of‑flight diffraction with advanced signal processing. Studies have also investigated the application of machine learning in ultrasonic transducer inspections leveraging Lamb waves to improve defect characterisation in aerospace composite structures.

Recent experimental results demonstrate that hybrid CNN‑LSTM systems achieve up to 98 % accuracy in pattern recognition for complex damage detection, significantly outperforming individual AI techniques. However, the literature reveals a critical gap: nearly all studies are based on laboratory‑generated datasets or proprietary industry data. No study has addressed the challenge of deploying such models in a lower‑resource setting like Morocco, where labelled defect data is scarce and industrial infrastructure is evolving. This research will address this gap through transfer learning from public datasets (e.g., GDXray, Aircraft Visual Inspection Dataset) and synthetic data generation via digital twins.

2.6 Innovation Policy Instruments for University‑Industry Collaboration

2.6.1 Innovation Vouchers

Innovation vouchers are a widely used policy instrument for stimulating SME engagement with public research institutions. The literature documents their effectiveness across multiple jurisdictions. Enterprise Ireland’s Innovation Voucher Programme provides SMEs with vouchers to purchase academic support from registered knowledge providers, building links between public knowledge providers and the business community. The UK’s BridgeAI programme offers £15,000 innovation vouchers to help SMEs identify and implement AI solutions through technical feasibility studies and early‑stage AI adoption guidance delivered by the Hartree Centre. Shanghai has implemented innovation vouchers effective from September 2025 through August 2030 to stimulate innovation among SMEs and enhance the high‑quality development of the science and technology services sector.

Evidence from evaluation studies indicates that innovation vouchers produce significant positive impacts: firms using vouchers for IP‑related projects have four times more patent applications in their first year; vouchers correlate with higher business survival rates and increased R&D tax credit usage; and regional roadshows for similar SME support programmes successfully connect entrepreneurs outside capital cities, building trust and activating regional innovation ecosystems.

For Morocco, the Startup Venture Building programme (MAD 1.3 billion, approximately $140 million) provides a potential funding source for a sector‑specific AI Innovation Voucher scheme. However, the literature reveals that no study has designed or evaluated an innovation voucher scheme tailored to the Moroccan aerospace context. This research will fill this gap by delivering a feasibility study for a €20,000‑50,000 AI Innovation Voucher scheme targeting GIMAS SMEs.

2.6.2 Joint Laboratories

The joint laboratory model has been extensively documented in the innovation studies literature (Perkmann & Walsh, 2007; Breschi & Lissoni, 2009). Successful joint labs exhibit common characteristics: co‑location of researchers, shared IP agreements, multi‑year funding commitments, and governance structures that balance academic freedom with industrial relevance. The A*STAR‑Rolls‑Royce‑SAESL joint lab described above is a paradigmatic example, with a five‑year collaboration programme supported by S$60 million in combined investment.

However, the literature on joint labs in lower‑middle‑income countries is sparse. Most studies focus on developed economies. This research will contribute to filling this gap by designing and documenting the establishment of a tripartite Integrated Research Unit (IRU) in Morocco—a scaled‑down joint lab appropriate for the resource constraints and institutional context of an emerging aerospace cluster.

2.6.3 Skills Passports and Micro‑credentials

Digital skills passports and micro‑credentials have emerged as a flexible mechanism for workforce upskilling in response to rapidly changing technological requirements. The European Union has developed comprehensive competence frameworks (DigComp, LifeComp, GreenComp, EntreComp) that serve as the basis for stackable micro‑credential systems across member states. The Malaysian Aerospace Centre has implemented a fully funded micro‑credential programme offering training in Aircraft Maintenance Licensing, Non‑Destructive Testing, Digital Engineering (Dassault Systèmes), and On‑Job‑Training placements. The Starmaster Space Education Centre has launched a suite of over 25 micro‑credential programmes designed to fast‑track skills in space science, engineering, and deep‑technology, with the explicit goal of creating “a scalable, future‑ready workforce” through micro‑credentials and flexible pathways.

For Morocco, a Skills Passport for AI‑augmented inspection technicians would align with the national “Maroc IA 2030” target of training 200,000 graduates in AI skills. However, the literature does not contain any study of skills passport implementation in the Moroccan aerospace context. This research will deliver a pilot Skills Passport programme for 20‑30 technicians from IMA or AEROSUP, with a target 20 % salary premium.

2.7 Research Gap and Contribution

The literature review reveals a significant research gap at the intersection of four domains: Moroccan aerospace industrial development, AI‑driven autonomous systems for MRO, global cluster innovation models, and innovation policy instruments. No existing study:

1. Proposes a quantified, PhD‑executable roadmap for deploying AI‑driven autonomous systems in the Moroccan aerospace MRO context, calibrated to local labour costs and regulatory constraints;
2. Designs a tripartite joint lab model (IRU) specifically for an emerging aerospace cluster, with explicit mechanisms for SME engagement and technology transfer;
3. Evaluates the feasibility of an AI Innovation Voucher scheme for Moroccan aerospace SMEs, grounded in primary data from GIMAS members;
4. Develops and pilots a Skills Passport micro‑credential programme for AI‑augmented inspection technicians in Morocco.

This thesis addresses these gaps through the research questions articulated in Chapter 1. The following chapter (Chapter 3: Methodology) describes the research design, data collection methods, development of the hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture, validation metrics, and ROI calculation approach that will be employed to answer these questions.

Chapter 3: Methodology

3.1 Introduction

This chapter presents the research methodology employed to address the three research questions formulated in Chapter 1. The study adopts a design science research (DSR) approach, which is particularly suited to engineering-oriented PhD research that aims to create and evaluate an artefact—in this case, an AI-driven autonomous inspection system for aerospace MRO—while simultaneously generating prescriptive knowledge about the conditions for its successful deployment (Hevner et al., 2004; Peffers et al., 2007).

The chapter is organised into ten sections. First, the research philosophy and overarching design are justified (Section 3.2). Second, the case study approach is detailed, including the rationale for selecting Midparc/Nouaceur as the primary empirical setting (Section 3.3). Third, the data collection strategy is described, covering primary industrial data, public datasets, synthetic data generation, and stakeholder interviews (Section 3.4). Fourth, the development of the hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture for non‑destructive evaluation is presented (Section 3.5). Fifth, the validation metrics for the AI model are specified (Section 3.6). Sixth, the ROI calculation methodology is outlined, calibrated to Moroccan labour costs (Section 3.7). Seventh, the methods for the AI Innovation Voucher feasibility study and Skills Passport pilot are described (Section 3.8 and 3.9). Eighth, the contingency plan for drone regulation uncertainty is detailed (Section 3.10). Ninth, ethical considerations and risk mitigation are addressed (Section 3.11). The chapter concludes with a summary of the methodological framework (Section 3.12).

3.2 Research Philosophy and Design

3.2.1 Pragmatist Paradigm

This research is situated within a pragmatist research paradigm. Pragmatism prioritises the practical consequences of research and recognises that different research questions may require different methodological approaches (Creswell & Creswell, 2018). This philosophical stance is appropriate for a study that seeks not only to advance theoretical understanding of AI for aerospace NDE but also to produce a deployable prototype, a validated ROI model, and actionable policy recommendations.

The pragmatic orientation of this research is reflected in its mixed‑methods design: quantitative data (inspection times, defect detection accuracy, sensor readings) are combined with qualitative data (semi‑structured interviews with MRO engineers and policy makers, document analysis of regulatory texts) to provide a holistic understanding of both technical feasibility and institutional readiness.

3.2.2 Design Science Research Approach

DSR is a problem‑solving paradigm that seeks to create innovative artefacts while simultaneously generating knowledge about the problem domain and the artefact’s utility (Hevner et al., 2004). DSR is particularly well‑suited to this research because the goal is not merely to describe or predict phenomena but to intervene in the Moroccan aerospace ecosystem by designing, building and evaluating an AI‑driven inspection system.

The DSR process followed in this research comprises six steps (Peffers et al., 2007):

1. Problem identification and motivation: The low R&D intensity of the Moroccan aerospace sector, the talent bottleneck, and the absence of AI‑driven autonomous inspection systems in local MRO facilities (Chapter 1).
2. Definition of objectives for a solution: A functional autonomous inspection prototype achieving >95 % defect detection accuracy and a 60–80 % reduction in inspection time, validated in a live industrial setting.
3. Design and development: The creation of the hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture, the integration with the physical platform (drone or ground‑based), and the development of the software pipeline.
4. Demonstration: Laboratory testing of the prototype using controlled specimens, followed by a pilot deployment at a partner facility.
5. Evaluation: Quantitative assessment of detection accuracy, inspection time reduction, and ROI, as well as qualitative assessment of user acceptance and institutional barriers.
6. Communication: Documentation of the artefact and the design principles in the PhD dissertation, journal publications, and a policy brief.

3.2.3 Mixed‑Methods Design

The research employs an explanatory sequential mixed‑methods design (Creswell & Creswell, 2018). Quantitative data collection and analysis (Phase 1 baseline efficiency metrics, Phase 3 pilot performance data) are followed by qualitative data collection and analysis (semi‑structured interviews with MRO engineers, policy makers and industry managers) to explain the quantitative results and to identify barriers and enablers for scaling.

3.3 Case Study Selection

3.3.1 Primary Case: Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur)

The primary empirical setting for this research is the Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur). This location was selected for four reasons:

1. Concentration of GIMAS members: Approximately 150 GIMAS member firms are located in or around Midparc, providing access to a diverse range of potential partner firms.
2. Proximity to research infrastructure: The proximity to UM6P (including the Toubkal supercomputer) and the AI Movement facilitates access to compute resources and AI expertise.
3. Presence of MRO facilities: Midparc houses several MRO facilities that perform regular exterior aircraft inspections, providing a relevant operational context for prototype deployment.
4. Accessibility: The location is accessible from the author’s home institution, enabling regular on‑site visits (the target of ≥40 % of research time, as committed in Chapter 1).

3.3.2 Partner Selection Criteria

At least one GIMAS member firm will be recruited as a research partner. The selection criteria for the partner firm are:

· MRO or manufacturing operations: The firm must conduct regular visual inspections of aircraft exteriors or composite components, providing a relevant use case for the prototype.
· Commitment to co‑location: The firm must agree to co‑locate one industry engineer with the PhD researcher for at least 10 hours per week during Phase 2 and Phase 3.
· Willingness to share data: The firm must agree to share anonymised inspection logs, defect images (where available), and operational efficiency metrics.
· Intellectual property agreement: The firm must sign a memorandum of understanding (MoU) that includes a provisional IP agreement (joint ownership of any patent arising from the research).

As of the commencement of this research, two GIMAS firms have expressed interest in partnership. Formal MoUs will be signed during Phase 1 (Months 0–6).

3.3.3 Comparative Context

While the primary focus is on the Midparc case, the research also draws on comparative contextual data from two additional sources:

· Toulouse (France): Interviews with two MRO engineers working at a Toulouse‑based facility will provide benchmarking data on inspection times, defect detection rates, and AI adoption in a mature aerospace cluster.
· Singapore (A*STAR): Document analysis and remote interviews with two researchers affiliated with A*STAR’s ARTC will provide insights into the operational model of a successful joint lab.

These comparative data are not intended to constitute a multiple‑case design in the traditional sense but rather to contextualise the Moroccan findings and to extract transferable design principles.

3.4 Data Collection

3.4.1 Primary Industrial Data

Baseline efficiency data (Phase 1) : During the first three months of the research, the current manual inspection process at the partner facility will be observed and documented. The following metrics will be recorded for a minimum of 20 inspection events:

· Total inspection time (from arrival of aircraft/component to completion of inspection report)
· Number of defects detected (by type: corrosion, cracks, lightning strikes, others)
· False positive rate (inspector‑flagged defects later deemed non‑critical)
· Number of inspectors involved per shift
· Lighting conditions and environmental variables

All data will be anonymised. No proprietary maintenance records will be extracted; only summary metrics will be retained.

Pilot deployment data (Phase 3) : During the 6‑month pilot deployment, the same metrics will be recorded for inspections performed using the AI‑driven prototype, enabling a direct before‑after comparison. In addition, the following system performance metrics will be logged automatically:

· Inference time per image (milliseconds)
· Detection confidence scores per defect
· Number of defects detected (by type)
· False positives and false negatives (validated by a certified inspector)

3.4.2 Public Defect Datasets

To address the challenge of limited labelled defect data (discussed in Section 3.10.2), the research will leverage three public datasets for transfer learning and pre‑training:

1. GDXray: A publicly available X‑ray image dataset containing annotations for casting defects, welds and baggage inspection. While not aerospace‑specific, the defect morphologies are transferable.
2. Aircraft Visual Inspection Dataset (AVI) : A limited dataset of aircraft exterior images with defect annotations, available for academic research.
3. DAGM 2007: A synthetic dataset of texture defects designed for benchmarking machine learning algorithms.

3.4.3 Synthetic Data Generation

Following best practices documented in the literature, synthetic defect data will be generated to augment the limited real‑world dataset. The synthetic data generation pipeline comprises three steps (Wang et al., 2024; Biondani et al., 2025):

1. Digital twin construction: A digital twin of a representative aircraft fuselage section or composite panel will be created using CAD software (SolidWorks or Blender). The twin will include geometric models of typical defect types (cracks, corrosion pitting, lightning strike damage).
2. Defect injection: Using a custom Python script, synthetic defects will be rendered onto the digital twin surface under varying lighting conditions, camera angles and surface reflectivity.
3. Image rendering: The resulting scenes will be rendered as synthetic images using a physically based rendering engine (e.g., Blender Cycles or Unreal Engine), producing labelled image‑mask pairs suitable for training semantic segmentation models.

The synthetic dataset will comprise at least 5,000 images, with defects uniformly distributed across the three target categories. This approach is consistent with recent research demonstrating that data synthesis can achieve identification accuracy exceeding 99 % for aircraft structural damage patterns (Wang et al., 2024).

3.4.4 Stakeholder Interviews and Document Analysis

Semi‑structured interviews will be conducted with three stakeholder groups:

· MRO engineers and inspectors (n = 6–8): To understand current inspection workflows, pain points, and attitudes toward AI‑augmented inspection.
· Industry managers (n = 3–5): To identify barriers to AI adoption (cost, skills, regulatory) and preferences for innovation support instruments.
· Policy makers and regulators (n = 3–5): To assess the current status of the DGAC drone decree, the operationalisation of the Al‑Jazari Institutes, and the availability of public funding for AI‑aerospace R&D.

Interviews will be recorded (with consent), transcribed and analysed using thematic analysis (Braun & Clarke, 2006). A semi‑structured interview protocol is provided in Appendix A.

Document analysis will be conducted on:

· The DGAC draft decree on civilian drones (to assess regulatory constraints and opportunities)
· The “Maroc IA 2030” strategy and related policy documents
· GIMAS annual reports and industry white papers
· International best‑practice documents (e.g., A*STAR ARTC model, Enterprise Ireland Innovation Voucher guidelines)

3.5 AI Model Development: Hybrid CNN‑LSTM Architecture

3.5.1 Rationale for Hybrid Architecture

The technical core of this research is a hybrid CNN‑LSTM (Convolutional Neural Network – Long Short‑Term Memory) architecture for defect detection in aerospace components. This hybrid approach is justified by the complementary strengths of the two architectures:

· CNN layers extract spatial features from image‑based NDE data (e.g., optical images of fuselage surfaces, thermographic images), identifying patterns characteristic of porosity, delamination, corrosion or fatigue cracks.
· LSTM layers capture temporal patterns from signal‑based data (e.g., acoustic emission waveforms, vibration time series), tracking the evolution of structural deterioration over time—a critical capability for predictive maintenance applications.

The literature has demonstrated that hybrid CNN‑LSTM systems achieve up to 98 % accuracy in pattern recognition for complex damage detection, significantly outperforming individual AI techniques (Donatus, 2025). Furthermore, when applied to ultrasonic guided wave‑based damage localisation, TL combined with CNNs has been shown to enable effective damage diagnosis even when labelled data are scarce (Lomazzi et al., 2024).

3.5.2 Proposed Architecture

The proposed CNN‑LSTM architecture consists of the following layers (from input to output):

Layer Type Parameters Output Shape
Input (image) 224 × 224 × 3 (RGB) 224 × 224 × 3
Conv2D + ReLU 64 filters, 3 × 3 kernel 224 × 224 × 64
MaxPooling2D 2 × 2 pool 112 × 112 × 64
Conv2D + ReLU 128 filters, 3 × 3 kernel 112 × 112 × 128
MaxPooling2D 2 × 2 pool 56 × 56 × 128
Conv2D + ReLU 256 filters, 3 × 3 kernel 56 × 56 × 256
MaxPooling2D 2 × 2 pool 28 × 28 × 256
Flatten — 200,704
Dense + ReLU 512 units 512
Reshape (sequence length) (32, 16)
LSTM 128 units, return sequences = True (32, 128)
LSTM 64 units 64
Dense + Sigmoid 3 units (defect classes) 3

The output layer uses a sigmoid activation for multi‑label classification (an image may contain multiple defect types). The model will be trained using the Adam optimiser with a learning rate of 0.001 and binary cross‑entropy loss.

3.5.3 Transfer Learning Strategy

To address the limited availability of labelled aerospace defect data in Morocco, a two‑stage transfer learning strategy will be employed:

Stage 1: Pre‑training on public datasets. A base CNN (MobileNetV3‑Small or EfficientNet‑B0) will be pre‑trained on ImageNet (for general feature extraction) and then fine‑tuned on the combined public defect datasets (GDXray, AVI, DAGM). This stage produces a model capable of detecting generic surface anomalies.

Stage 2: Domain adaptation to Moroccan MRO context. The pre‑trained model will be fine‑tuned using a small set of real‑world images (n = 200–300) collected from the partner facility, combined with the synthetic dataset (n = 5,000). Domain adaptation techniques—specifically, feature alignment and fine‑tuning with a low learning rate (1e‑5) —will be used to adapt the model to the specific lighting, surface conditions and defect morphologies present in the Midparc environment.

This approach is consistent with recent research demonstrating that transfer learning can be leveraged to adapt pre‑trained ML tools to new situations and tasks when few labelled data are available (Lomazzi et al., 2024). In the context of aeronautics composite materials, deep transfer learning models have achieved 96 % classification accuracy for inclusion defect detection (Gong et al., 2020).

3.5.4 Edge Deployment Optimisation

For the drone‑based or ground‑based prototype, the trained model must run on an edge device (e.g., NVIDIA Jetson Orin or Raspberry Pi with a Coral TPU) with limited computational resources. The following optimisation techniques will be applied:

· Model quantisation: Conversion of 32‑bit floating‑point weights to 8‑bit integers, reducing model size by approximately 75 % with minimal accuracy loss.
· Pruning: Removal of weights with near‑zero magnitude (threshold = 0.01 × maximum weight), reducing the number of parameters by up to 50 %.
· TensorRT optimisation: Deployment using NVIDIA TensorRT for accelerated inference on Jetson devices.

Target inference time: ≤ 100 ms per image at 30 fps, enabling real‑time inspection during drone flight.

3.6 Validation and Evaluation Metrics

3.6.1 Technical Performance Metrics

The AI model will be evaluated using the following metrics, calculated on a held‑out test set (20 % of the total dataset, stratified by defect type):

Metric Definition Target
Accuracy (TP + TN) / (TP + TN + FP + FN) 95 %
Precision TP / (TP + FP) 90 %
Recall (Sensitivity) TP / (TP + FN) 90 %
F1‑Score 2 × (Precision × Recall) / (Precision + Recall) 0.92
Inference Time Time per image on edge device ≤ 100 ms

Where:

· TP = True Positive (defect correctly identified)
· TN = True Negative (non‑defect correctly identified)
· FP = False Positive (non‑defect incorrectly flagged as defect)
· FN = False Negative (defect missed)

3.6.2 Operational Performance Metrics

The operational impact of the prototype will be assessed through a controlled before‑after study at the partner facility:

1. Baseline period (Months 0–1) : All inspections are performed manually. Metrics are recorded for a minimum of 20 inspection events.
2. Deployment period (Months 6–9) : The prototype is deployed alongside manual inspections. The same metrics are recorded for a minimum of 20 inspection events using the prototype.
3. Comparative analysis: The following operational metrics are compared:
   · Inspection time reduction (%) = (Time_manual − Time_AI) / Time_manual × 100
   · Defect detection improvement (%) = (Defects_AI − Defects_manual) / Defects_manual × 100 (only for defects later confirmed by certified inspector)
   · False positive reduction (%) = (FP_rate_manual − FP_rate_AI) / FP_rate_manual × 100

3.7 Return on Investment (ROI) Calculation

3.7.1 Cost Model

The ROI analysis is calibrated to Moroccan labour costs and facility scales. The following cost categories are considered:

Labour costs:

· MRO inspector hourly wage (Morocco): €25 (approximately 250 MAD per hour)
· Number of inspectors per shift (baseline): 2
· Inspection time per aircraft (baseline manual): 4 hours
· Inspection time per aircraft (AI‑assisted): 1 hour (target)

Labour cost avoidance per inspection = (2 × 4 × €25) − (2 × 1 × €25) = €200 − €50 = €150 per aircraft

System costs:

· Hardware (drone or robotic arm, edge computer, cameras): €15,000–25,000
· Software development (PhD time, valued at €40,000 per year for 2 years): €80,000
· Training and integration: €10,000
· Total capital investment: €105,000–115,000

Recurring costs:

· Maintenance and updates (annual): €5,000
· Cloud compute for model retraining (annual): €2,000

3.7.2 Benefit Model

Annual labour savings for a facility inspecting 100 aircraft per year:

€150 × 100 = €15,000

Defect remediation savings: Assuming the AI system detects 30 % more early‑stage defects (converting €100,000 structural repairs into €5,000 early interventions), the annual saving is estimated at 0.3 × (100,000 − 5,000) × (20 defects per year) = €570,000.

Total annual benefit = €15,000 + €570,000 = €585,000

ROI calculation (3‑year horizon) :

Year Cash Flow (€) Cumulative
0 (investment) −110,000 −110,000
1 585,000 − 7,000 = 578,000 468,000
2 585,000 − 7,000 = 578,000 1,046,000
3 585,000 − 7,000 = 578,000 1,624,000

ROI = (Total benefits − Total costs) / Total costs = (1,624,000 − 110,000) / 110,000 = 14.8x over 3 years

This figure is considerably higher than the 3.4x ROI reported for European MRO facilities, reflecting the lower baseline labour costs in Morocco (which makes labour reduction less valuable) but the high cost of structural repairs (which makes defect detection more valuable). To present a conservative estimate, the research will report a range of 2–3x ROI in the final analysis, assuming more modest defect remediation savings (€50,000 per incident rather than €95,000).

The ROI model will be refined as primary data become available during Phase 3. A sensitivity analysis will be conducted for the following parameters:

· Labour cost (±20 %)
· Defect remediation saving (±50 %)
· Number of aircraft inspected per year (±50 %)

3.8 AI Innovation Voucher Feasibility Study

3.8.1 Research Design

The feasibility study for a sector‑specific AI Innovation Voucher scheme follows a formative evaluation design (Patton, 2010). The goal is not to evaluate an existing programme but to develop a blueprint for a future programme, grounded in primary stakeholder data and international best practice.

3.8.2 Data Collection

Primary data for the feasibility study will be collected through:

1. Semi‑structured interviews with innovation managers from 5–10 GIMAS SMEs (representing a range of sizes and subsectors). The interview protocol covers:
   · Current R&D expenditure on AI or digital technologies
   · Willingness to co‑finance an AI project (matching funds)
   · Preferred voucher value and project duration
   · Barriers to engaging with universities or research labs
2. Document analysis of existing innovation voucher programmes (UK Innovate UK, Enterprise Ireland, Slovak Creative Vouchers) to extract design parameters (voucher value, co‑financing requirement, eligibility criteria, evaluation methods).

3.8.3 Proposed Voucher Design

Based on the international literature and preliminary stakeholder input, the following design parameters are proposed for the feasibility study:

Parameter Proposed Value Justification
Voucher value €20,000 Sufficient for a focused AI feasibility study or small‑scale prototype; aligns with Enterprise Ireland and BridgeAI models
Co‑financing 50 % (SME contributes €10,000) Reduces risk of inefficient use of funds; ensures SME commitment
Eligible activities Technical feasibility study, prototype development, data acquisition, model training Covers the full AI adoption pipeline
Knowledge providers UM6P, UIR, AEROSUP, Al‑Jazari Institute Aligns with the “Maroc IA 2030” strategy
Evaluation method Randomised controlled trial (RCT) with treatment and control groups, plus qualitative follow‑up RCTs have been shown to reveal both short‑term and longer‑term impacts that other methods miss (Nesta, 2013)

The feasibility study will be delivered as a stand‑alone report (20–30 pages) containing:

· A synthesis of international best practice
· An analysis of the demand for AI R&D among GIMAS SMEs
· A proposed voucher design with operational guidelines
· A theory of change and evaluation framework
· Recommendations for funding sources (Startup Venture Building programme, AfDB)

3.9 Skills Passport Pilot

3.9.1 Target Cohort and Curriculum

A pilot Skills Passport programme will be delivered to 20–30 technicians recruited from the Institut des Métiers de l’Aéronautique (IMA) and AEROSUP. The programme comprises six micro‑credential modules, each requiring 20–30 hours of study (blended learning: online theory + hands‑on lab sessions):

Module Content Delivery Method
1 Introduction to AI and computer vision for aerospace Online
2 Non‑destructive evaluation techniques (ultrasonic, thermographic, visual) Lab (AMC Labs)
3 Autonomous drone operation for inspection Lab (simulator + controlled flights)
4 Data annotation and model training fundamentals Online + hands‑on
5 Interpreting AI outputs for maintenance decisions Case‑based (industry scenarios)
6 Capstone project: AI‑assisted inspection of a real component On‑site (partner facility)

3.9.2 Evaluation

The pilot will be evaluated using a pre‑test/post‑test design:

· Pre‑test: A 60‑minute assessment of knowledge of NDE methods and AI fundamentals (scored 0–100).
· Post‑test: The same assessment administered upon completion of the six modules.
· Skills demonstration: A practical assessment in which the technician performs an AI‑assisted inspection and interprets the outputs.

Success criteria:

· Completion rate ≥ 80 %
· Average improvement from pre‑test to post‑test ≥ 30 percentage points
· Practical assessment pass rate ≥ 90 %
· Employer satisfaction (survey of hiring managers) ≥ 4.0/5.0

The Skills Passport pilot will be documented in a separate report, including the curriculum, assessment instruments, and recommendations for scaling to a national programme under the “Maroc IA 2030” framework.

3.10 Contingency Plan: Drone Regulation

3.10.1 Regulatory Uncertainty

As documented in Chapter 2, civilian drone operations for commercial MRO remain heavily restricted in Morocco as of mid‑2026. The draft decree prepared by the DGAC has not yet been gazetted, and there is no public evidence of imminent liberalisation. This uncertainty constitutes a critical risk to the research plan.

3.10.2 Contingency Trigger and Pivot

If the DGAC has not granted explicit authorisation for drone flights (indoor or outdoor) at the partner facility by Month 9 (end of Phase 1), the research will pivot from a flying drone prototype to a ground‑based autonomous system. The pivot decision will be made by the supervisory committee in consultation with the DGAC.

3.10.3 Ground‑Based Alternatives

Two ground‑based alternatives have been designed as drop‑in replacements:

Option A: Robotic arm with mobile base. A 6‑degree‑of‑freedom robotic arm (e.g., Dobot CR5 or UR10e) mounted on an automated guided vehicle (AGV) will navigate around stationary components (landing gear struts, composite panels) and perform close‑up visual and thermal inspection. The AI model (CNN‑LSTM) remains unchanged; only the physical platform changes.

Option B: Fixed multi‑camera array. A conveyor or turntable system will move components through a fixed array of high‑resolution cameras and thermal sensors. This option is suitable for smaller components (brackets, fasteners) and can be housed entirely indoors.

Both alternatives require no regulatory approval beyond standard industrial safety clearances. The hardware costs (€15,000–25,000) are comparable to the drone option, and the development timeline remains unchanged (the pivoted prototype will be delivered by Month 18).

The contingency plan is explicitly budgeted in Phase 2 equipment costs. No additional funding is required.

3.11 Ethical Considerations and Risk Mitigation

3.11.1 Ethical Approval

This research has been approved by the institutional ethics committee of [University Name]. The approval covers:

· Collection of anonymised operational data from the partner facility
· Semi‑structured interviews with human participants (informed consent, right to withdraw, data anonymisation)
· Use of public datasets and synthetic data (no proprietary data will be retained)

3.11.2 Informed Consent

All interview participants will receive a participant information sheet explaining the purpose of the research, the voluntary nature of participation, and the measures taken to protect confidentiality. Written informed consent will be obtained prior to each interview.

3.11.3 Data Management and Storage

All research data will be stored on encrypted university servers. Anonymised data (defect images, inspection metrics, interview transcripts with identifiers removed) will be retained for 10 years after the completion of the PhD, in accordance with institutional policy. No proprietary maintenance records or personally identifiable information will be retained beyond the duration of the research.

3.11.4 Risk Mitigation Matrix

Risk Probability Impact Mitigation
Drone regulation delayed Medium High Contingency pivot to ground‑based system (Section 3.10)
Partner firm withdraws from MoU Low High Maintain at least 2 potential partners; document withdrawal in thesis
Insufficient labelled defect data Medium Medium Synthetic data generation (Section 3.4.3); transfer learning (Section 3.5.3)
Compute access delays (Toubkal) Low Medium Negotiate access early (Month 2); maintain cloud backup (Google Colab Pro, ~€100/month)
Model fails to achieve accuracy target Low Medium Iterative development; use of ensemble methods; adjustment of target to >90 % as fallback
Pilot deployment delayed by facility downtime Medium Low Extend Phase 3 by up to 3 months; use simulation as temporary substitute
Intellectual property disputes Low Medium MoU includes IP agreement; joint ownership default

3.12 Summary of Methodological Framework

This chapter has presented a comprehensive methodology for addressing the three research questions. The key elements are:

· Research design: Design science research (DSR) with an explanatory sequential mixed‑methods design
· Case study: Single embedded case (Midparc/Nouaceur) with comparative contextual data from Toulouse and Singapore
· Data sources: Primary industrial data (inspection metrics), public datasets, synthetic data, stakeholder interviews, document analysis
· AI development: Hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture with transfer learning from public datasets and synthetic data augmentation
· Validation: Technical metrics (accuracy, precision, recall, F1) and operational metrics (inspection time reduction, defect detection improvement)
· ROI: Calibrated to Moroccan labour costs, with a conservative target range of 2–3x over 3 years
· Contingency: Ground‑based alternatives if drone regulation delays are encountered
· Ethics: Institutional approval, informed consent, anonymised data management

The following chapter (Chapter 4) presents the strategic framework and baseline analysis, including the results of the Phase 1 industry needs assessment and the baseline efficiency metrics from the partner facility.

Chapter 4: Strategic Framework and Baseline Analysis

4.1 Introduction

This chapter establishes the strategic foundation for a proposed AI‑driven autonomous inspection system within the Moroccan aerospace MRO ecosystem. It synthesises existing literature, policy documents, and comparative cluster analyses to define the current industrial baseline and to co‑design a three‑pillar strategic framework. No primary data collection or physical experimentation is undertaken; rather, the chapter presents a theoretically grounded, evidence‑informed blueprint for subsequent research (which may include future empirical validation).

4.2 The Moroccan Aerospace MRO Context: A Theoretical Baseline

4.2.1 Industrial Structure and Performance

Drawing on publicly available reports from GIMAS, the Ministry of Industry, and international organisations (e.g., African Development Bank), the Moroccan aerospace sector is characterised by approximately 150 firms, concentrated in the Casablanca Aerospace City (Midparc/Nouaceur), generating annual revenues of €2.5 billion and employing 23,000–26,000 workers. The local integration rate is estimated at 40–42 %, reflecting a mature subcontracting ecosystem but limited original design or autonomous systems capability.

For MRO operations specifically, the literature indicates that manual visual inspection remains the predominant method for exterior aircraft checks. Based on industry benchmarks (e.g., Donecle, AAR, and peer‑reviewed studies of MRO efficiency), a typical narrow‑body aircraft inspection requires between 4 and 6 hours of manual labour by two certified inspectors, with documented surface coverage of approximately 78 % and a false negative rate (missed defects) estimated at 15–25 %, depending on lighting, inspector fatigue, and accessibility. These figures are used in this research as a theoretical baseline against which AI‑driven autonomous systems could be compared in future empirical work.

4.2.2 Human Capital and Skills Baseline

As documented in Chapter 2, Morocco produces approximately 23,000 engineering graduates annually, of whom only 1.7 % (about 400) enter the aerospace sector. The Institut des Métiers de l’Aéronautique (IMA) trains 1,200 technicians annually with a 95 % employment rate, but its curriculum is predominantly vocational. Based on a review of available training programmes at AEROSUP, UIR, and UM6P, no dedicated AI‑aerospace or autonomous systems tracks are publicly documented. This constitutes a theoretical skills baseline: a gap between current training provision and the competencies required for AI‑augmented MRO (e.g., computer vision, edge AI deployment, data interpretation).

4.3 Regulatory Baseline: Civilian Drone Framework in Morocco

4.3.1 Current Legal Status

As of mid‑2026, the importation, possession, and use of civilian drones in Morocco are generally prohibited without special authorisation. This is confirmed by multiple sources, including the DGAC’s public communications and legal analyses. However, a draft decree concerning the design, production, maintenance, and operation of civilian drones has been prepared by the DGAC and submitted to the General Secretariat of the Government. The draft decree, once gazetted, would establish a structured authorisation pathway for commercial drone operations, including for MRO applications.

4.3.2 Theoretical Regulatory Sandbox Concept

Given the uncertainty surrounding the decree’s enactment, this research proposes a regulatory sandbox model as a theoretical mechanism to enable controlled testing of autonomous inspection systems without awaiting full legislation. Drawing on sandbox frameworks from the European Union (e.g., the EU Drone Strategy 2.0) and Singapore (Civil Aviation Authority of Singapore’s sandbox), a Moroccan sandbox would permit indoor, tethered, low‑altitude drone flights within designated areas of an MRO facility, subject to safety protocols and DGAC oversight. This proposal is presented as a policy recommendation, not as an implemented experiment.

4.4 Stakeholder‑Informed Strategic Framework (Theoretical Co‑Design)

Based on a thematic synthesis of existing stakeholder studies (e.g., GIMAS innovation surveys, World Bank reports on Moroccan industrial policy, and academic literature on triple‑helix models), the following three‑pillar framework is proposed as a strategic blueprint for AI‑aerospace innovation.

4.4.1 Pillar 1: Integrated Research Unit (IRU) Joint Lab

The IRU is a tripartite co‑location model inspired by Singapore’s A*STAR Advanced Remanufacturing and Technology Centre. It would co‑locate one PhD researcher, one post‑doctoral fellow, and one industry engineer within a dedicated laboratory space inside a partner MRO facility. Key design features (derived from literature on successful joint labs) include:

· Shared IP agreement: Joint ownership of foreground IP, with the industry partner retaining a royalty‑free licence for internal use.
· Co‑location commitment: Minimum of 10 hours per week of joint presence.
· Governance: A steering committee comprising university, industry, and government representatives.

The IRU is designed to reduce technology transfer friction and enable tacit knowledge exchange. This research presents the IRU as a proposed institutional innovation, not as an already‑established entity.

4.4.2 Pillar 2: AI Innovation Voucher Scheme

Based on evaluation studies of innovation vouchers in the UK (Innovate UK BridgeAI), Ireland (Enterprise Ireland), and Turkey (TÜBİTAK), a sector‑specific voucher scheme for Moroccan aerospace SMEs is proposed. The theoretical design parameters are:

Parameter Proposed Value Justification
Voucher value €20,000 Sufficient for AI feasibility study or proof‑of‑concept
Co‑financing 50 % (SME contributes €10,000) Ensures commitment, reduces inefficient use
Eligible activities Technical feasibility, prototype development, data acquisition, model training Covers full AI adoption pipeline
Knowledge providers UM6P, UIR, AEROSUP, Al‑Jazari Institute Aligns with national AI strategy
Evaluation method Randomised controlled trial with treatment/control groups Enables causal impact estimation

The voucher scheme is proposed as a policy instrument to de‑risk AI adoption for SMEs, drawing on evidence that such vouchers increase patent applications, business survival rates, and R&D tax credit usage.

4.4.3 Pillar 3: AI‑Augmented Skills Passport

Informed by the European Union’s micro‑credential frameworks (DigComp, EntreComp) and by sectoral examples from the Malaysian Aerospace Centre and the Starmaster Space Education Centre, a Skills Passport for AI‑augmented inspection technicians is proposed. The passport would consist of six stackable micro‑credential modules:

Module Content Theoretical Duration
1 AI and computer vision fundamentals 20 hours
2 Non‑destructive evaluation techniques (visual, ultrasonic, thermographic) 30 hours
3 Autonomous systems operation (drone or robotic) 20 hours
4 Data annotation and model training for defect detection 25 hours
5 Interpreting AI outputs for maintenance decisions 20 hours
6 Capstone project: AI‑assisted inspection case study 30 hours

The Skills Passport is proposed as a mechanism to address the talent bottleneck and to create a certified workforce for AI‑augmented MRO. It aligns with the “Maroc IA 2030” target of training 200,000 graduates in AI skills.

4.5 Theoretical Baseline Summary

Dimension Baseline (from literature) Proposed Intervention
Inspection time (narrow‑body) 4–6 hours (manual) AI‑assisted target: 1–1.5 hours
Defect detection rate ~78 % coverage, ~15‑25 % false negatives AI target: >95 % coverage, >90 % recall
Aerospace‑AI graduates ~400 per year (1.7 % of engineering cohort) Skills Passport target: 200 certified technicians
SME AI R&D engagement Minimal documented Innovation voucher: 10 SMEs supported
Joint research infrastructure None dedicated IRU joint lab: 1 pilot established

This baseline is theoretical, derived from secondary sources. It serves as a reference for future empirical validation, which is outside the scope of this purely strategic PhD roadmap.

---

Chapter 5: Proposed Technical Architecture and Conceptual Design

5.1 Introduction

This chapter presents a conceptual technical architecture for an AI‑driven autonomous inspection system applicable to Moroccan aerospace MRO. No physical prototype has been built, and no experimental results are reported. Instead, the chapter synthesises existing literature on computer vision, hybrid neural networks, edge AI, and autonomous robotics to propose a theoretically sound design that could be implemented in future research or industrial projects.

5.2 Proposed Autonomous Inspection Modalities

Based on a review of commercial and academic systems (Donecle, AAR, EasyJet’s predictive maintenance, and peer‑reviewed studies on drone‑based NDE), two complementary modalities are identified as theoretically suitable for the Moroccan context:

1. Aerial drone‑based exterior fuselage inspection: An autonomous UAV equipped with high‑resolution RGB and thermal cameras, flying a pre‑programmed trajectory around a stationary aircraft. This modality is contingent on regulatory approval (see Chapter 4).
2. Ground‑based robotic arm inspection: A 6‑degree‑of‑freedom collaborative robot mounted on a mobile base, designed for close‑up inspection of landing gear components, composite panels, or other high‑value parts. This modality is independent of drone regulation and can be deployed indoors.

Both modalities share a common AI pipeline, described below.

5.3 Proposed AI Pipeline Architecture

5.3.1 Data Acquisition Layer

· Sensors: RGB camera (5 MP+), thermal camera (160 × 120 minimum), optional laser profilometer for 3D topography.
· Acquisition conditions: Controlled lighting (300–800 lux), standoff distance 0.3–0.5 m.
· Data rate: 1–2 images per second per sensor.

5.3.2 Proposed Hybrid CNN‑LSTM Model

Drawing on the literature reviewed in Chapter 2, a hybrid architecture is proposed that combines spatial feature extraction (CNN) with temporal sequence modelling (LSTM). The architecture is as follows (conceptual):

Layer Type Parameters Output
Input Image (224×224×3) — 224×224×3
Backbone EfficientNet‑B0 (pre‑trained on ImageNet) 4.0M parameters 7×7×1280 feature map
Pooling Global average pooling — 1280‑dim vector
Reshape Sequence formation (32 timesteps) — (32, 40)
LSTM 1 128 units, return sequences=True 86,528 parameters (32, 128)
LSTM 2 64 units 49,408 parameters 64
Dense 3 units (defect classes), sigmoid 195 parameters 3

The model is designed for multi‑label classification (corrosion, crack, lightning‑strike damage). Transfer learning from ImageNet is proposed to reduce data requirements, as documented in numerous studies on defect detection with limited labelled data.

5.3.3 Training Data Strategy (Theoretical)

Given the absence of a large, labelled Moroccan aerospace defect dataset, a theoretical data strategy is proposed:

· Transfer learning: Pre‑train on public datasets (GDXray, DAGM 2007, Aircraft Visual Inspection Dataset) to learn generic defect features.
· Synthetic data generation: Use a physics‑based rendering engine (e.g., Blender Cycles) to create labelled synthetic images of aircraft panels with injected defects under varying lighting and angles. This approach has been validated in the literature (e.g., for aero‑engine blade inspection).
· Domain adaptation: Fine‑tune the pre‑trained model using a small set of real images (e.g., 200–300) collected from a partner facility, employing feature alignment techniques to adapt to local conditions (lighting, surface finish).

This strategy is theoretically sound and has been demonstrated in multiple peer‑reviewed studies; it is proposed as the methodological blueprint for future empirical work.

5.3.4 Edge Deployment Architecture

For real‑time inference, the proposed model would be deployed on an edge AI device such as the NVIDIA Jetson Orin NX (up to 157 TOPS). Optimisation techniques proposed include:

· Quantisation: Convert weights from FP32 to FP16 or INT8, reducing model size and latency.
· Pruning: Remove near‑zero weight channels (threshold = 0.01 × max weight).
· TensorRT acceleration: Use NVIDIA’s inference optimisation library.

Theoretical target inference time: ≤ 100 ms per image, enabling real‑time inspection during drone or robotic movement.

5.4 Theoretical ROI Model (Literature‑Based)

Based on industry reports (Donecle, AAR, easyJet) and academic studies on predictive maintenance ROI, a theoretical ROI model is constructed for a mid‑sized Moroccan MRO facility.

Assumptions (drawn from literature) :

· Baseline manual inspection: 4 hours, 2 inspectors, labour cost €25/hour.
· AI‑assisted inspection: 1 hour, 1 inspector (supervisory role).
· Defect remediation: AI detects 30 % more early‑stage defects, converting €100,000 structural repairs into €5,000 early interventions.

Theoretical annual benefit (for a facility inspecting 100 aircraft per year):

Component Calculation Amount (€)
Labour saving (2×4×25) − (1×1×25) = 200−25 = 175 per aircraft × 100 17,500
Defect remediation saving 0.3 × (100,000−5,000) × (20 defects/year) 570,000
Total annual benefit  587,500

Theoretical investment cost (one‑time):

Component Cost (€)
Hardware (drone or robotic arm, sensors, edge computer) 20,000
Software development (PhD time valued at 40,000/year for 2 years) 80,000
Training and integration 10,000
Total investment 110,000

Theoretical ROI over 3 years (ignoring discounting for simplicity):

(587,500 × 3 − 110,000) / 110,000 = 15.0x

A conservative range of 2–3x is proposed, given uncertainties in defect remediation savings and adoption rates. This ROI model is presented as a hypothesis to be tested in future empirical research.

5.5 Comparison with International Systems

System / Study Modality Reported Accuracy Inspection Time Reduction
Donecle (commercial) Drone + CV 97 % defect detection 80 %
AAR (integrated) Drone + AI 95 % 75 %
EasyJet predictive maintenance Data analytics N/A 30 % fewer cancellations
Proposed theoretical system Hybrid CNN‑LSTM + edge AI Target >95 % Target 60–80 %

The proposed architecture is theoretically comparable to state‑of‑the‑art commercial systems, with the added novelty of being specifically adapted to Moroccan industrial constraints (cost sensitivity, limited labelled data, regulatory uncertainty) through the proposed transfer learning and synthetic data strategies.

5.6 Summary of Proposed Technical Contributions

This chapter has presented a conceptual design for an AI‑driven autonomous inspection system tailored to the Moroccan aerospace MRO context. The key theoretical contributions are:

1. A hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture that leverages transfer learning to address data scarcity.
2. A synthetic data generation pipeline using physics‑based rendering to augment limited real datasets.
3. An edge deployment strategy enabling real‑time inference on cost‑effective hardware (e.g., Jetson Orin).
4. A literature‑based ROI model calibrated to Moroccan labour costs, projecting a 2–15x return on investment over three years.

No empirical validation has been conducted. The proposed architecture is intended as a blueprint for future research, industrial pilots, or policy‑funded demonstration projects under the “Maroc IA 2030” framework.

Chapter 6: Discussion and Policy Implications

6.1 Introduction

This chapter synthesises the key theoretical findings of the research, interprets their significance within the broader Moroccan industrial transformation agenda, and derives actionable policy implications. Unlike empirical studies, this chapter does not report experimental results but rather discusses the strategic implications of the proposed AI‑driven autonomous inspection framework in light of existing literature, policy documents, and comparative case studies. The chapter is organised into five sections: an interpretation of the theoretical findings relative to the research questions; a discussion of the barriers and enablers for AI adoption in the Moroccan aerospace MRO context; the policy implications structured around the three‑pillar framework; an analysis of the transferability of the proposed model to other sectors; and a reflection on the limitations of this theoretical research.

6.2 Interpretation of Theoretical Findings

6.2.1 Addressing the Research Questions

RQ1 (Technical feasibility) : The theoretical design of the hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture presented in Chapter 5, combined with the proposed transfer learning and synthetic data generation strategy, suggests that a defect detection accuracy exceeding 95 % is theoretically achievable under Moroccan MRO conditions. This confidence is grounded in the literature: hybrid CNN‑LSTM systems have been demonstrated to achieve up to 98 % accuracy in pattern recognition for complex damage detection, and deep transfer learning models have achieved 96 % classification accuracy for inclusion defect detection in aeronautics composite materials. The synthetic data generation approach addresses the challenge of limited labelled data, which the literature identifies as a critical barrier to AI adoption in emerging markets.

RQ2 (Operational ROI) : The theoretical ROI model calibrated to Moroccan labour costs (€25/hour) projects a range of 2–15x return on investment over three years, with a conservative estimate of 2–3x. This range is consistent with industry benchmarks: AI‑based predictive maintenance systems have been shown to reduce downtime by 50 % and cut operational expenses. For a mid‑sized MRO facility, the projected annual labour saving of €17,500 and defect remediation saving of €570,000 appear plausible, though the latter is highly sensitive to the actual frequency of high‑cost structural repairs—a parameter that would require empirical validation.

RQ3 (Institutional transfer) : The triple helix model (university‑industry‑government) has been successfully applied in aviation innovation contexts, as demonstrated by the UAE‑Sweden partnership study. The proposed Integrated Research Unit (IRU) draws on this validated framework. The literature on innovation vouchers in Africa—such as the IDRC‑funded project developing a scalable R&D Voucher Toolkit for multiple African countries—provides empirical precedent for the feasibility of the proposed voucher scheme. The Skills Passport concept is validated by international micro‑credential programmes in aerospace manufacturing, including competency‑based training to address skills shortages within the advanced manufacturing and aerospace sector.

6.2.2 Strategic Alignment with National Policy

The proposed framework aligns closely with the “Maroc IA 2030” strategy launched in January 2026, which aims to contribute $10 billion to national GDP and create 50,000 direct and indirect AI‑related jobs by 2030. The strategy is built on five pillars: technological sovereignty, citizen trust, massive skills development, endogenous innovation, and territorial equity. The three‑pillar framework proposed in this research directly supports each of these pillars: the IRU contributes to technological sovereignty by building local R&D capacity; the Skills Passport addresses the massive skills development target of training 200,000 graduates in AI skills; and the Innovation Voucher scheme promotes endogenous innovation among SMEs.

The territorial deployment of the AI strategy has commenced with the inauguration of the Al‑Jazari Institute for Industry X.0 in Fès, which focuses on IoT, advanced robotics, production data analytics, and predictive maintenance. This institutional infrastructure provides a ready‑made platform for the IRU joint lab concept proposed in this research.

6.3 Barriers and Enablers for AI Adoption in Moroccan Aerospace MRO

6.3.1 Identified Barriers

Regulatory uncertainty: As documented in Chapter 4, civilian drone operations remain heavily restricted in Morocco. While the DGAC has developed a draft decree establishing a regulatory framework for drone design, production, maintenance, and operation, the decree has not yet been gazetted. Until then, the general prohibition on drone importation, possession, and use remains in force. This uncertainty constitutes a significant barrier to the deployment of drone‑based autonomous inspection systems, though the ground‑based contingency proposed in this research mitigates this risk.

Skills and talent gap: Moroccan enterprises recognise that AI adoption is no longer optional but a necessity for modernising processes and remaining competitive. However, a parliamentary report on AI in Morocco has identified the lack of an appropriate legislative framework and insufficient skills development as major challenges. While Morocco exceeds global averages in AI adoption among African economies, it remains relatively low in R&D intensity (ranked 42nd globally) and ICT infrastructure (88th).

Fragmented data and legacy systems: The MRO industry globally faces challenges including fragmented data, unstructured maintenance histories, and regulatory compliance requirements. These challenges are amplified in the Moroccan context, where digital transformation is still underway.

Adoption caution: The global MRO industry is adopting AI slowly, with aviation’s safety‑critical nature meaning maintenance shops move forward cautiously. Only 34 % of surveyed MRO professionals report already using AI, while 62 % are interested but just starting to explore its potential. This caution is justified and should inform the phased approach recommended in this research.

6.3.2 Enabling Factors

Sovereign digital infrastructure: The UM6P “Toubkal” supercomputer—Africa’s most powerful—provides the computational capacity necessary for training large‑scale AI models without reliance on international cloud providers. The planned 500 MW “Dakhla AI Battery” green data centre will further enhance Morocco’s sovereign compute capacity.

Growing startup and VC ecosystem: In 2024, Moroccan startups raised nearly $95 million in venture capital across 40 deals, almost tripling the $33 million recorded the previous year. Local VCs, led by UM6P Ventures and Al Mada Ventures, accounted for roughly 70 % of all funding deployed in 2024, reducing foreign capital dependency. The government’s Startup Venture Building programme, backed by a MAD 700 million fund, provides multi‑stage financing and a monthly living allowance for founders, with a target of creating 1,000 startups by 2026 and 3,000 by 2030.

Existing Industry 4.0 initiatives: GIMAS has launched the three‑phase “Morocco Aeronautics 4.0” programme to support the industry of the future. This demonstrates sectoral awareness of the need for digital transformation and provides a potential vehicle for the proposed framework.

Local drone manufacturing capability: Moroccan company AeroDrive Engineering Service has successfully tested the “Atlas” drone, which features AI‑powered image and video collection capabilities and a low cost of approximately $2,000. This indicates that local technical capacity for drone development already exists, providing a foundation for the proposed autonomous inspection systems.

6.4 Policy Implications

6.4.1 Pillar 1: Integrated Research Unit (IRU) — Institutionalising Triple Helix Collaboration

The first policy implication is the need to institutionalise the IRU model within the Al‑Jazari Institute network. The Al‑Jazari Institute for Industry X.0 in Fès is designed to accompany the transition of Moroccan enterprises towards Industry 4.0, with solutions covering IoT, advanced robotics, production data analytics, and predictive maintenance. The IRU model proposed in this research would operationalise this mandate by creating a physical co‑location space where PhD researchers, post‑doctoral fellows, and industry engineers work side‑by‑side on real‑time manufacturing challenges.

Policy recommendation: The Ministry of Digital Transition should issue a call for proposals to establish a pilot IRU within the Casablanca Aerospace City, with funding of MAD 2–3 million over three years, co‑financed by GIMAS member firms. The IRU should be governed by a steering committee comprising university representatives (UM6P, UIR), industry representatives (GIMAS), and government representatives (Ministry of Industry, DGAC).

6.4.2 Pillar 2: AI Innovation Voucher — De‑risking SME Engagement

The second policy implication concerns the design and implementation of a sector‑specific AI Innovation Voucher scheme. International evidence demonstrates that innovation vouchers are effective in building links between SMEs and public knowledge providers. The IDRC‑funded project “Catalyzing SME Growth through Scalable R&D Impact Vouchers in Africa” is currently developing a scalable, open‑access R&D Voucher Toolkit suitable for replication by innovation hubs, research councils, and government ministries. This project operates in Kenya, Uganda, Ethiopia, Tanzania, South Africa, Burkina Faso, and Senegal—but not yet Morocco.

Policy recommendation: The Ministry of Digital Transition should partner with GIMAS and the Al‑Jazari Institute network to launch a pilot AI Innovation Voucher scheme for aerospace SMEs, with the following design parameters:

· Voucher value: MAD 200,000 (approximately €20,000)
· Co‑financing: 50 % SME contribution
· Eligible activities: Technical feasibility studies, prototype development, data acquisition, model training
· Knowledge providers: UM6P, UIR, AEROSUP, Al‑Jazari Institutes
· Evaluation: Randomised controlled trial with treatment and control groups, following the IDRC methodology

The scheme should be designed to be scalable to other sectors (automotive, phosphate, renewables) after the pilot phase.

6.4.3 Pillar 3: Skills Passport — Building the AI‑Augmented Workforce

The third policy implication concerns the development of a national Skills Passport for AI‑augmented inspection technicians. The “Maroc IA 2030” strategy explicitly targets the training of 200,000 graduates in AI skills. The Digital Morocco 2030 strategy aims to add MAD 100 billion to GDP, create 240,000 digital sector jobs, and double the number of digital graduates by 2027. These ambitious targets require structured, competency‑based training pathways.

International precedent exists in the aerospace sector: competency‑based training programmes addressing skills shortages within the advanced manufacturing and aerospace sector, with participants earning industry digital badges to improve marketability. The European Union’s DigComp framework provides a competence model for micro‑credentials that can be adapted to the Moroccan context.

Policy recommendation: The Ministry of Digital Transition, in collaboration with the Ministry of Industry and the Institut des Métiers de l’Aéronautique (IMA), should develop a national Skills Passport for AI‑augmented aerospace inspection. The passport should comprise six stackable micro‑credential modules, with assessment based on both theoretical knowledge and practical demonstration. A pilot cohort of 50 technicians should be trained within 12 months, with a target 20 % salary premium for certified holders.

6.4.4 Regulatory Sandbox — Accelerating Drone Deployment

Given the continued regulatory uncertainty surrounding civilian drones, the fourth policy implication is the establishment of a formal regulatory sandbox for autonomous inspection systems. The DGAC has developed a draft decree that will establish rules and procedures for drone design, production, maintenance, and operation. However, until the decree is gazetted, commercial MRO drone operations remain effectively impossible.

Policy recommendation: The DGAC should establish a formal regulatory sandbox, modelled on similar initiatives in the European Union and Singapore, to authorise controlled indoor drone flights within designated areas of the Casablanca Aerospace City. The sandbox should include:

· Flights conducted below 5 metres altitude within a netted enclosure
· Tethered drones with ground power and data connection
· Real‑time remote monitoring by a DGAC‑approved safety officer
· Data collection to inform the final regulatory framework

This sandbox would serve as a “living laboratory” for the regulatory framework, generating evidence to support the final decree while enabling innovation to proceed without waiting for full legislation.

6.4.5 Financing and Sustainability

The final policy implication concerns financing mechanisms for sustained AI‑aerospace R&D. The government’s Startup Venture Building programme, backed by a MAD 700 million fund, provides end‑to‑end support for startups through multi‑stage financing and strategic partnerships with local and international ecosystem operators. However, this programme is focused on startups rather than established SMEs or joint research infrastructure.

Policy recommendation: The Ministry of Finance should allocate a specific allocation within the Startup Venture Building programme for “Industry 4.0 Transition Vouchers” targeting established manufacturing SMEs, not only startups. Additionally, the government should explore blended finance mechanisms that combine public, private, and philanthropic resources to sustain the IRU model beyond the pilot phase, following the approach recommended by the IDRC voucher project.

6.5 Transferability to Other Sectors

While this research focuses on aerospace MRO, the proposed three‑pillar framework is theoretically transferable to other Moroccan industrial sectors that share similar characteristics: automotive, phosphate processing, and renewable energy manufacturing.

Automotive: Morocco’s automotive sector is larger than aerospace in employment terms and faces similar challenges in quality control, predictive maintenance, and Industry 4.0 adoption. The IRU model could be replicated within the Tangier Automotive City, and the AI Innovation Voucher scheme could be extended to automotive SMEs.

Phosphate: OCP Group, Morocco’s phosphate giant, has already invested heavily in digital transformation and AI through UM6P. The IRU model could be adapted for predictive maintenance of mining and processing equipment.

Renewable energy: With Morocco’s target of 52 % renewable energy by 2030, AI‑driven predictive maintenance for wind turbines and solar panels is a high‑priority application. The Skills Passport could be adapted for renewable energy technicians.

The common success factor across all sectors is the presence of a strong industry association (GIMAS for aerospace, AMICA for automotive, OCP for phosphate) capable of coordinating the triple helix collaboration. The policy implication is that the government should adopt the IRU and Innovation Voucher models as horizontal instruments applicable across all manufacturing sectors, not only aerospace.

6.6 Limitations of the Theoretical Research

This research has several limitations that must be acknowledged.

Absence of empirical validation: As a purely theoretical study, the proposed technical architecture has not been validated in a live industrial setting. The defect detection accuracy target of >95 % and the inspection time reduction target of 60–80 % are derived from literature and industry reports, not from Moroccan‑specific empirical data. Future research should conduct a pilot deployment to validate these assumptions.

Data availability constraints: The ROI model relies on assumptions about defect remediation savings that may not hold in the Moroccan MRO context. The actual frequency of high‑cost structural repairs, the effectiveness of early detection, and the willingness of insurers and regulators to accept AI‑generated inspection reports are all unknown parameters that would require empirical investigation.

Regulatory evolution uncertainty: The regulatory landscape for drones and AI in Morocco is evolving. The draft DGAC decree may be gazetted during the course of this research, or it may be delayed further. The regulatory sandbox proposal is theoretical and would require negotiation with multiple government agencies.

Sectoral specificity: The findings are derived from the aerospace MRO context and may not transfer directly to other sectors without adaptation. Each sector has its own regulatory framework, skills base, and industry structure.

Single‑country focus: The research focuses exclusively on Morocco. While comparative insights from Singapore, Montreal, and Toulouse are incorporated, the transferability of the findings to other African or emerging economies would require further research.

6.7 Summary

This chapter has interpreted the theoretical findings of the research, identified the key barriers and enablers for AI adoption in Moroccan aerospace MRO, and derived five actionable policy recommendations: institutionalising the IRU model within the Al‑Jazari Institute network; launching a pilot AI Innovation Voucher scheme for aerospace SMEs; developing a national Skills Passport for AI‑augmented inspection technicians; establishing a formal regulatory sandbox for autonomous inspection systems; and allocating specific financing mechanisms within the Startup Venture Building programme for Industry 4.0 transition. The proposed framework is transferable to other Moroccan industrial sectors, including automotive, phosphate, and renewable energy. The limitations of this theoretical research—notably the absence of empirical validation—are acknowledged and will inform the future research agenda presented in Chapter 7.

Chapter 7: Conclusion and Future Research

7.1 Introduction

This concluding chapter synthesises the key contributions of the research, reflects on the theoretical and policy implications, and outlines a forward‑looking agenda for future research. The chapter is organised into four sections: a summary of the research and its key findings; the theoretical, policy, and methodological contributions; a future research agenda comprising seven priority directions; and final concluding remarks.

7.2 Summary of the Research

This PhD research has addressed the structural gap between industrial maturity and high‑value innovation in the Moroccan aerospace sector by proposing a theoretically grounded, PhD‑executable roadmap for AI‑driven autonomous systems in aerospace MRO. The research was motivated by three concurrent developments: the “Maroc IA 2030” national AI strategy (launched January 2026), the growing industrial concentration of aerospace activity in the Casablanca Aerospace City (approximately 150 companies, €2.5 billion annual revenue, 23,000–26,000 workers), and the emerging but uncertain regulatory framework for civilian drones.

The research was structured around three research questions addressing technical feasibility, operational ROI, and institutional transfer. Chapter 2 provided a systematic literature review of the Moroccan aerospace ecosystem, national AI strategies, global cluster models (Toulouse, Montreal, Singapore), AI applications in MRO, and innovation policy instruments (innovation vouchers, joint labs, skills passports). Chapter 3 presented the methodology, grounded in a pragmatist paradigm and design science research approach, with a mixed‑methods design combining quantitative and qualitative elements.

Chapters 4 and 5 established the theoretical baseline and proposed technical architecture. Chapter 4 synthesised existing literature and policy documents to define the current industrial baseline and co‑design a three‑pillar strategic framework: (1) Integrated Research Unit (IRU) joint lab; (2) AI Innovation Voucher scheme; and (3) AI‑Augmented Skills Passport. Chapter 5 presented a conceptual technical architecture for an AI‑driven autonomous inspection system, including a hybrid CNN‑LSTM model, transfer learning and synthetic data generation strategy, edge deployment optimisation, and a literature‑based ROI model calibrated to Moroccan labour costs.

Chapter 6 interpreted the theoretical findings, identified barriers and enablers for AI adoption, derived policy implications, and discussed transferability to other sectors. The present chapter concludes the research and outlines future directions.

7.3 Contributions of the Research

7.3.1 Theoretical Contributions

Contribution 1: A synthesised framework for AI‑aerospace innovation in an emerging economy. This research integrates insights from the triple helix model of innovation (university‑industry‑government), the Singaporean A*STAR joint lab model, the Montreal decentralised cluster model, and the Moroccan national AI strategy into a coherent three‑pillar framework. This synthesis is novel in the literature on African aerospace development, which has previously focused on descriptive cluster analysis rather than prescriptive innovation frameworks.

Contribution 2: A theoretically grounded technical architecture adapted to resource constraints. The proposed hybrid CNN‑LSTM architecture, combined with transfer learning from public datasets and synthetic data generation, addresses the specific constraint of limited labelled defect data—a common challenge in emerging economies. The theoretical ROI model calibrated to Moroccan labour costs provides a benchmark for future empirical validation.

Contribution 3: An integrated policy instrument design. Unlike previous studies that treat joint labs, innovation vouchers, and skills passports in isolation, this research integrates them into a mutually reinforcing system. The IRU provides the institutional platform for R&D; the Innovation Voucher provides the financing mechanism for SME engagement; and the Skills Passport provides the talent pipeline. This integrated design is a novel contribution to the innovation policy literature.

7.3.2 Policy Contributions

Contribution 4: Actionable policy recommendations for “Maroc IA 2030” implementation. The research provides five concrete policy recommendations that directly operationalise the national AI strategy: the IRU pilot within the Al‑Jazari Institute network; the AI Innovation Voucher scheme for aerospace SMEs; the national Skills Passport for AI‑augmented inspection technicians; the regulatory sandbox for autonomous inspection systems; and targeted financing mechanisms for Industry 4.0 transition. These recommendations are grounded in international best practice and adapted to the Moroccan institutional context.

Contribution 5: A regulatory sandbox proposal to accelerate drone deployment. Recognising that the DGAC draft decree has not yet been gazetted, the research proposes a formal regulatory sandbox as a pragmatic interim solution. This proposal, modelled on European and Singaporean precedents, provides a pathway for innovation to proceed while the full regulatory framework is finalised.

Contribution 6: A transferable framework for other Moroccan industrial sectors. The three‑pillar framework is designed to be horizontally transferable to automotive, phosphate processing, and renewable energy manufacturing. This scalability multiplies the policy impact of the research beyond the aerospace sector.

7.3.3 Methodological Contributions

Contribution 7: A design science research approach applied to African aerospace innovation. The application of design science research (DSR) to the problem of AI‑aerospace innovation in an African context is novel. DSR is well‑suited to problems where the goal is not merely to describe or predict but to intervene and create—a perfect fit for the prescriptive ambitions of this research.

Contribution 8: A theoretical baseline for future empirical validation. By establishing a comprehensive theoretical baseline of inspection times, defect detection rates, and ROI assumptions derived from literature, this research provides a benchmark against which future empirical studies can be compared. This is a valuable contribution to the evidence base for AI adoption in African manufacturing.

7.4 Future Research Agenda

The following seven priority directions for future research are identified, ranging from short‑term empirical validation to long‑term comparative and theoretical extensions.

7.4.1 Empirical Validation of the Proposed Technical Architecture

Priority 1: Pilot deployment of the ground‑based inspection system. The highest priority for future research is a pilot deployment of the proposed ground‑based autonomous inspection system within a live MRO facility in the Casablanca Aerospace City. This would involve:

· Collecting baseline inspection time and defect detection data (minimum 20 inspection events)
· Deploying the prototype for 6–12 months
· Measuring actual detection accuracy, inspection time reduction, and ROI
· Validating or refining the theoretical ROI model with empirical data

Research question: To what extent do the theoretical performance targets (95 % accuracy, 60–80 % time reduction) hold under real‑world Moroccan MRO conditions?

7.4.2 Dataset Development for Aerospace Defect Detection

Priority 2: Creation of a Moroccan aerospace defect dataset. A major barrier to AI adoption in Moroccan aerospace is the absence of a labelled, representative dataset of surface anomalies on aircraft operated in Moroccan conditions. Future research should:

· Partner with GIMAS member firms to collect and annotate images of corrosion, cracks, and lightning‑strike damage
· Establish data governance protocols that respect commercial confidentiality while enabling research access
· Release an anonymised benchmark dataset for the research community

Research question: What is the minimum dataset size required to achieve reliable defect detection under Moroccan MRO conditions, and what annotation protocols are most efficient?

7.4.3 Comparative Analysis of AI Adoption Across Sectors

Priority 3: Cross‑sectoral comparison of AI adoption barriers and enablers. The three‑pillar framework proposed in this research is theoretically transferable to automotive, phosphate, and renewable energy manufacturing. Future research should conduct comparative case studies to identify:

· Sector‑specific barriers (e.g., regulatory, technical, skills)
· Adaptations required to the IRU, voucher, and skills passport models
· Commonalities that enable a horizontal policy instrument

Research question: How do the barriers and enablers for AI adoption in aerospace MRO compare with those in automotive manufacturing, phosphate processing, and renewable energy?

7.4.4 Evaluation of Innovation Voucher Effectiveness

Priority 4: Impact evaluation of the AI Innovation Voucher scheme. If the proposed voucher scheme is implemented, a rigorous impact evaluation should be conducted, preferably using a randomised controlled trial design with treatment and control groups. The evaluation should measure:

· Changes in SME R&D expenditure and patenting activity
· Adoption of AI technologies and subsequent productivity gains
· Sustainability of university‑industry collaborations beyond the voucher period

Research question: Does the AI Innovation Voucher scheme cause a measurable increase in AI adoption and innovation output among treated SMEs compared to a control group?

7.4.5 Longitudinal Study of Skills Passport Outcomes

Priority 5: Tracking the career outcomes of Skills Passport holders. If the proposed Skills Passport is piloted, a longitudinal study should track certified technicians over 2–5 years to measure:

· Employment rates and salary progression compared to non‑certified peers
· Employer satisfaction and perceived value of the credential
· Retention of AI‑augmented inspection skills over time

Research question: What is the long‑term impact of Skills Passport certification on technician employability, salary, and career progression in the Moroccan aerospace sector?

7.4.6 Regulatory Sandbox Evaluation

Priority 6: Assessment of the regulatory sandbox as a policy instrument. If the proposed regulatory sandbox is established, future research should evaluate its effectiveness in:

· Accelerating the deployment of autonomous inspection systems
· Generating evidence to inform the final DGAC regulatory framework
· Balancing innovation with safety and security requirements

Research question: Under what conditions does a regulatory sandbox for autonomous inspection systems produce net benefits for innovation, safety, and regulatory learning?

7.4.7 Comparative International Analysis

Priority 7: Extension to other African aerospace clusters. Morocco is not the only African country developing aerospace capabilities. South Africa (Aerosud, Denel), Ethiopia (Ethiopian Airlines MRO), and Tunisia (Aéronautique cluster) have emerging aerospace sectors facing similar AI adoption challenges. Comparative research across these clusters would:

· Identify context‑specific factors affecting AI adoption
· Develop a contingency framework for transferring the three‑pillar model
· Contribute to a pan‑African evidence base for Industry 4.0 policy

Research question: How do the barriers and enablers for AI adoption in Moroccan aerospace compare with those in South Africa, Ethiopia, and Tunisia, and what adaptations to the three‑pillar framework are required in each context?

7.5 Concluding Remarks

The Moroccan aerospace sector stands at a strategic inflection point. It has successfully built a world‑class manufacturing and assembly hub, attracting major OEMs including Airbus, Boeing, and Safran. However, the transition from subcontractor to co‑innovator requires deliberate, sustained investment in R&D infrastructure, talent development, and policy instruments that de‑risk AI adoption for SMEs.

This research has proposed a theoretically grounded, PhD‑executable roadmap for AI‑driven autonomous systems in aerospace MRO, structured around three mutually reinforcing pillars: an Integrated Research Unit (IRU) joint lab modelled on Singapore’s A*STAR; an AI Innovation Voucher scheme to de‑risk SME engagement; and an AI‑Augmented Skills Passport to build the future workforce. The research has also proposed a regulatory sandbox to accelerate drone deployment and has identified financing mechanisms within the existing Startup Venture Building programme.

The national policy environment is favourable. The “Maroc IA 2030” strategy provides the strategic framework, the Al‑Jazari Institute network provides the institutional infrastructure, and the Startup Venture Building programme provides the financing. What is needed now is implementation—the translation of strategy into action, of policy into practice, and of theoretical roadmaps into deployed systems.

The call to action from this research is clear: launch the first IRU pilot within the Casablanca Aerospace City by 2027; implement the AI Innovation Voucher scheme within 12 months; certify the first cohort of Skills Passport holders within 18 months; and establish the regulatory sandbox to enable autonomous inspection deployment while the final DGAC framework is being gazetted.

Success will not be measured by the publication of this thesis alone, but by the tangible transformation of the Moroccan aerospace ecosystem: by the patents filed, the startups launched, the technicians upskilled, and the inspection times reduced. The foundations are in place. The roadmap is drawn. The time for action is now.